Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-104.10
Child born out of wedlock; agency or attorney; duty to inform biological mother.

The agency or attorney representing the biological mother shall inform the mother of the legal and medical need to determine, whenever possible, the paternity of the child prior to an adoption and that her failure or refusal to accurately identify the biological father or possible biological fathers could threaten the legal validity of any adoptive placement of the child.

Laws 1995, LB 712, § 3.